el: Ποικιλία κοκτέιλ με βάση την μπύρα: Spritzer με μπύρα; Hard Soda με βάση την μπύρα; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Ράντλερ; Shandy; Snakebite; Άλλο
es: Variedad de cócteles a base de cerveza: Spritzer de cerveza; Refresco con alcohol a base de cerveza; Black and tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Otro
ko: 맥주 칵테일 종류: 맥주 스프리처; 맥주 베이스 하드 소다; 블랙 앤 탄; 보일러메이커; 첼라다; 미첼라다; 라들러; 섄디; 스네이크바이트; 기타
tr: Bira bazlı kokteyl çeşitleri: Bira Spritzer; Bira bazlı alkollü soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Diğer
pt-PT: Variedade de cocktail à base de cerveja: Spritzer de cerveja; Refrigerante alcoólico à base de cerveja; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Outro
cs: Různé koktejly na bázi piva: Pivní střik; Pivní hard soda; Řezané pivo (Black and Tan); Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Jiné
hu: Sör alapú koktélváltozat: Sörfröccs; Söralapú hard soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Egyéb
nb: Ølbasert cocktailvariant: Ølspritzer; Ølbasert hard soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Annet
sl-SI: Različni koktajli na osnovi piva: Pivski brizganec; Gazirana alkoholna pijača na osnovi piva; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Drugo
bg-BG: Разнообразие от коктейли на бирена основа: Бирен шприц; Твърда сода на основата на бира; Блек енд тан; Бойлърмейкър; Челада; Мичелада; Радлер; Шанди; Снейкбайт; Друго
de: Bierbasierte Cocktailvariationen: Bierschorle; Bierbasiertes Hard-Soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Sonstige
ro-RO: Varietate de cocktailuri pe bază de bere: Șpriț cu bere; Hard Soda pe bază de bere; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Altele
ru: Вид коктейля на основе пива: Пивной шпритцер; Алкогольная газировка на основе пива; Блэк энд тан (Black and Tan); Бойлермейкер; Челада; Мичелада; Радлер; Шенди; Снейкбайт; Другое
pl: Odmiana koktajlu na bazie piwa: Szprycer piwny; Hard soda na bazie piwa; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Inne
fr: Variété de cocktail à base de bière: Spritzer à la bière; Soda alcoolisé à base de bière; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Panaché; Snakebite; Autre
da: Type af ølbaseret cocktail: Ølspritzer; Ølbaseret hard soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Andet
nl: Soorten cocktails op basis van bier: Bierspritzer; Hard soda op bierbasis; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta koktela na bazi piva: Pivski špricer; Hard soda na bazi piva; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Ostalo
it: Varietà di cocktail a base di birra: Spritzer alla birra; Hard soda a base di birra; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Altro
vi: Các loại cocktail pha từ bia: Beer Spritzer; Soda có cồn từ bia; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Khác
th: ประเภทของค็อกเทลที่ทำจากเบียร์: เบียร์สปิริตเซอร์; ฮาร์ดโซดาผสมเบียร์; แบล็กแอนด์แทน; บอยล์เลอร์เมกเกอร์; เชลาดา; มิเชลาดา; แรดเลอร์; แชนดี้; สเนกไบต์; อื่นๆ
sv: Ölbaserad cocktailvariant: Ölspritzer; Ölbaserad läsk (hard soda); Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Övrigt
zh-TW: 啤酒雞尾酒種類: 啤酒氣泡酒; 啤酒基底硬蘇打; 黑白啤; 深水炸彈; 契拉達; 米切拉達; 檸檬啤酒; 仙迪; 蛇咬; 其他
en: Beer-based cocktail variety: Beer Spritzer; Beer-Based Hard Soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Other
zh-CN: 啤酒基鸡尾酒品类: 啤酒气泡饮; 啤酒基底硬苏打; 黑与棕混合啤酒; 深水炸弹; 奇拉达; 米切拉达; 拉德勒; 仙迪; 蛇咬; 其他
pt-BR: Variedade de coquetel à base de cerveja: Spritzer de cerveja; Refrigerante alcoólico à base de cerveja; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Outros
ja: ビールベースのカクテルの種類: ビールスプリッツァー; ビールベースハードソーダ; ブラックアンドタン; ボイラーメーカー; チェラーダ; ミチェラーダ; ラドラー; シャンディ; スネークバイト; その他
sk-SK: Druh koktailu na báze piva: Pivný spritzer; Alkoholická sóda na báze piva; Rezané pivo; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Iné
fi: Olutpohjainen cocktailvalikoima: Olutspritzer; Olutpohjainen hard soda; Black and Tan; Boilermaker; Chelada; Michelada; Radler; Shandy; Snakebite; Muu
lt-LT: Alaus kokteilių asortimentas: Alaus špriceris; Alaus pagrindo kietasis limonadas; „Black and Tan“; „Boilermaker“; „Chelada“; „Michelada“; Radleris; Šendis; „Snakebite“; Kita